New Jersey, session 222, S3258.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding any other provision of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.), any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, the provisions of N.J.A.C.2:76-20.4, any requirements established by the State Agriculture Development Committee concerning grant programs for stewardship activities on land preserved for farmland preservation purposes, or any other rules or regulations concerning grants for stewardship activities on preserved farmland adopted by the committee, to the contrary, grant amounts available to farmers for farmland stewardship activities on preserved farmland may total up to $100,000 per application.  Any monetary limit on the amount per acre with regard to such grants shall be adjusted as necessary to allow for the maximum grant amount of $100,000 per application. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.